Illinois, session 104th, HB5808.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interscholastic Athletic Organization Act 5is amended by adding Section 1.30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 25/1.30 new)7    Sec. 1.30. Student-athlete transfer. 8    (a) An association or other entity that has as one of its 9purposes promoting, sponsoring, regulating, or in any manner 10providing for interscholastic athletics or any form of 11athletic competition among schools and students within this 12State shall allow, in its rules and regulations, 13student-athletes in grades 9 through 12 to transfer to another 14school and be granted full athletic eligibility at the 15receiving school if both the sending school's and receiving 16school's principals or official representatives provide 17written consent to the association or entity for the transfer.18    (b) The consent under subsection (a) shall include 19confirmation that, to the best of the principal's or official 20representative's knowledge, the principal or official 21representative is not aware that any coach, athletic director, 22or staff member affiliated with the receiving school's 23athletic department conducted any recruitment or engaged in   HB5808- 2 -LRB104 23030 LNS 39484 b1any other form of communication with the transferring student 2that influenced the decision to transfer.3    (c) If the principal or official representative provides 4written consent to the association or entity under subsection 5(a), the association or entity may not restrict the 6transferring student's athletic eligibility, regardless of the 7student's reason for transferring. However, if the student 8transfers in a given school year after the official start date 9of the athletic season for the activity the student was 10participating in at the sending school, the student is 11ineligible to participate in that athletic activity for the 12remainder of the school year.13    (d) The receiving school shall enforce any period of 14ineligibility imposed upon the student by the sending school 15or that would have been imposed upon the student by the sending 16school had the student not transferred, even if the student is 17otherwise eligible under this Section. This period of 18ineligibility at the receiving school shall be for the 19remaining duration of the period of ineligibility or 365 days 20after the date of the transfer, whichever is less.